Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.270

Notice of petition requirements when not respondent's home state on filing date.

If a petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is brought in this state and this state was not the respondent's home state on the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice requirements of this state, notice of the petition must be given to those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding were brought in the respondent's home state. The notice must be given in the same manner as notice is required to be given in this state.

[ 2009 c 81 s 14.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.